Illinois, session 104th, HB2836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 3-699.26 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.26 new)7    Sec. 3-699.26. Air Medal license license plates. 8    (a) The Secretary of State, upon receipt of all applicable 9fees and applications made in the form prescribed by the 10Secretary, may issue special registration plates designated as 11Air Medal plates. The special plates issued under this Section 12shall be affixed only to passenger vehicles of the first 13division, motorcycles, and motor vehicles of the second 14division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds. Plates under 15this Section shall expire according to the multi-year 16procedure established by Section 3-414.1 of this Code. 17    (b) The plates shall display the Air Medal. In all other 18respects, the design and color of the special plates shall be 19wholly within the discretion of the Secretary. Appropriate 20documentation, as determined by the Secretary, shall accompany 21each application. The Secretary may, in his or her discretion, 22allow the plates to be issued as vanity plates or personalized 23in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The plates   HB2836- 2 -LRB104 10767 LNS 20847 b1are not required to designate "Land of Lincoln", as prescribed 2in subsection (b) of Section 3-412 of this Code. The Secretary 3shall prescribe the eligibility requirements and, in his or 4her discretion, shall approve and prescribe stickers or decals 5as provided under Section 3-412.